Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1272.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin GHENT; WATER INFRASTRUCTURE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $7,039,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Public Facilities Authority for a grant to the city of Ghent for improvements to municipal water infrastructure. $5,084,000 of this appropriation is to acquire real property for, and to predesign, design, and construct improvements necessary to expand and rehabilitate the city's sanitary ponds to address water quality and capacity issues caused by inflow and infiltration and capacity limits due to the city's population. $1,955,000 of this appropriation is for construction of a new water tower and associated clean drinking water infrastructure to improve water pressure for resident and fire suppression purposes, and to meet requirements imposed by Lincoln Pipestone Rural Water. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $7,039,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end